it: Tipo di tavola acquatica compatibile: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Tavola da surf longboard; Multiplo/universale; Tavola da surf shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Tavola da surf; Wakeboard; Tavola da windsurf; Altro
sv: Kompatibel vattenbrädatyp: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard-surfbräda; Flera/universell; Shortboard-surfbräda; Skimboard; SUP-bräda (Stand-up paddleboard); Surfbräda; Wakeboard; Vindsurfbräda; Övrigt
tr: Uyumlu su boardu tipi: Bodyboard; Foil sörf tahtası; Kiteboard; Longboard sörf tahtası; Çoklu / evrensel; Shortboard sörf tahtası; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Sörf tahtası; Wakeboard; Rüzgar sörfü tahtası; Diğer
da: Kompatibel vandbrætstype: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard-surfbræt; Flere / universel; Shortboard-surfbræt; Skimboard; Stand up paddleboard (SUP); Surfbræt; Wakeboard; Windsurfbræt; Andet
de: Kompatibles Wassersportgerät: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard-Surfbrett; Mehrere / universal; Shortboard-Surfbrett; Skimboard; Stand-Up-Paddleboard (SUP); Surfbrett; Wakeboard; Windsurfbrett; Sonstige
nb: Kompatibel vannbrettype: Bodyboard; Foilbrett; Kitebrett; Longboard-surfebrett; Flere / universell; Shortboard-surfebrett; Skimboard; SUP-brett (Stand-up paddleboard); Surfebrett; Wakeboard; Vindsurfebrett; Annet
nl: Compatibel type watersportplank: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard-surfplank; Meerdere/universeel; Shortboard-surfplank; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfplank; Wakeboard; Windsurfplank; Overige
ko: 호환 워터 보드 유형: 보디보드; 포일 보드; 카이트보드; 롱보드 서핑보드; 복수/범용; 숏보드 서핑보드; 스킴보드; 스탠드업 패들보드(SUP); 서핑보드; 웨이크보드; 윈드서핑 보드; 기타
fr: Type de planche aquatique compatible: Bodyboard; Planche de foil; Planche de kitesurf; Planche de surf longboard; Multiples / universel; Planche de surf shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddle (SUP); Planche de surf; Wakeboard; Planche à voile; Autre
pl: Zgodny typ deski do pływania: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Deska surfingowa typu longboard; Wiele / uniwersalne; Deska surfingowa typu shortboard; Skimboard; Deska SUP (Stand-up paddleboard); Deska surfingowa; Wakeboard; Deska windsurfingowa; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de prancha de água compatível: Bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Kiteboard; Prancha de surf longboard; Vários / Universal; Prancha de surf shortboard; Skimboard; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Prancha de surf; Wakeboard; Prancha de windsurf; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta daske za vodene sportove: Bodyboard; Foil daska; Kiteboard; Longboard daska za surfanje; Višestruko / univerzalno; Shortboard daska za surfanje; Skimboard; Daska za uspravno veslanje (SUP); Daska za surfanje; Wakeboard; Daska za jedrenje na dasci; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de prancha para desporto aquático compatível: Prancha de bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Prancha de kitesurf; Prancha de surf longboard; Múltipla/universal; Prancha de surf shortboard; Prancha de skimboard; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Prancha de surf; Prancha de wakeboard; Prancha de windsurf; Outra
hu: Kompatibilis vízi deszka típus: Bodyboard; Foil deszka; Kiteboard; Longboard szörfdeszka; Többféle / univerzális; Shortboard szörfdeszka; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Szörfdeszka; Wakeboard; Windsurf deszka; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容水上滑板類型: 趴板; 水翼板; 風箏衝浪板; 長板衝浪板; 多種/通用; 短板衝浪板; 沙板; 立式划槳 (SUP); 衝浪板; 滑水板; 風帆衝浪板; 其他
zh-CN: 适用水上运动板类型: 趴板; 水翼板; 风筝冲浪板; 长板冲浪板; 多种 / 通用; 短板冲浪板; 沙板; 站立式桨板 (SUP); 冲浪板; 尾波板; 帆板; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta deske za vodo: Bodyboard; Foil deska; Kiteboard; Longboard deska za surfanje; Več / univerzalno; Shortboard deska za surfanje; Skimboard; Deska za stoječe veslanje (SUP); Deska za surfanje; Wakeboard; Deska za jadranje na deski; Drugo
es: Tipo de tabla de agua compatible: Bodyboard; Tabla foil; Kiteboard; Tabla de surf longboard; Múltiple / universal; Tabla de surf shortboard; Skimboard; Tabla de surf de remo (SUP); Tabla de surf; Wakeboard; Tabla de windsurf; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní typ surfu: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard (surf); Několik/univerzální; Shortboard (surf); Skimboard; Paddleboard (SUP); Surfové prkno; Wakeboard; Prkno na windsurfing; Jiné
ru: Совместимый тип водной доски: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Кайтборд; Лонгборд для серфинга; Несколько / универсальный; Шортборд для серфинга; Скимборд; Сапборд (SUP); Доска для серфинга; Вейкборд; Доска для виндсерфинга; Другое
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ vodnej dosky: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Surfboard longboard; Viacero / univerzálne; Surfboard shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfovacia doska; Wakeboard; Windsurfová doska; Iné
th: ประเภทกระดานกีฬาทางน้ำที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: บอดี้บอร์ด; ฟอยล์บอร์ด; ไคท์บอร์ด; กระดานโต้คลื่นลองบอร์ด; หลากหลาย / อเนกประสงค์; กระดานโต้คลื่นชอร์ตบอร์ด; สกิมบอร์ด; กระดานซับบอร์ด (SUP); กระดานโต้คลื่น; เวกบอร์ด; วินด์เซิร์ฟบอร์ด; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo vandenlentė: Bodibordas; Burlentė su povandeniniu sparnu; Jėgos aitvarų lenta; Ilgoji banglentė; Kelios / universali; Trumpoji banglentė; Skimbordas; Irklentė (SUP); Banglentė; Vandenlentė; Burlentė; Kita
ja: 対応水板タイプ: ボディボード; フォイルボード; カイトボード; ロングボードサーフボード; 複数 / ユニバーサル; ショートボードサーフボード; スキムボード; スタンドアップパドルボード (SUP); サーフボード; ウェイクボード; ウィンドサーフボード; その他
en: Compatible water board type: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Longboard surfboard; Multiple / universal; Shortboard surfboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfboard; Wakeboard; Windsurf board; Other
vi: Loại ván nước tương thích: Ván lướt sóng nằm (Bodyboard); Ván lướt sóng cánh ngầm (Foil board); Ván lướt ván diều (Kiteboard); Ván lướt sóng dài; Nhiều loại / đa năng; Ván lướt sóng ngắn; Ván lướt sóng bờ (Skimboard); Ván chèo đứng (SUP); Ván lướt sóng; Ván lướt ván canô (Wakeboard); Ván lướt ván buồm; Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva vesiurheilulaudan tyyppi: Bodyboard; Foil-lauta; Leijalauta; Longboard-surffilauta; Useita / universaali; Shortboard-surffilauta; Skimboard; SUP-lauta; Surffilauta; Wakeboard; Purjelauta; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместим тип водна дъска: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Кайтборд; Сърф лонгборд; Множество / универсален; Сърф шортборд; Скимборд; Стандъп падълборд (SUP); Сърфборд; Уейкборд; Уиндсърф дъска; Друг
ro-RO: Tip de placă nautică compatibilă: Bodyboard; Placă cu foil (foil board); Kiteboard; Placă de surf longboard; Multiple / universal; Placă de surf shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Placă de surf; Wakeboard; Placă de windsurf; Altele
el: Συμβατός τύπος σανίδας νερού: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Σανίδα του σερφ longboard; Πολλαπλό / γενικής χρήσης; Σανίδα του σερφ shortboard; Skimboard; Σανίδα όρθιας κωπηλασίας (SUP); Σανίδα του σερφ; Wakeboard; Σανίδα του γουίντσερφ; Άλλο